Utah statutes.
48-3a-110.   Registration of name.

(1)  A foreign limited liability company not registered to do business in this state under Part 9, Foreign Limited Liability Companies, may register its name, or an alternate name adopted pursuant to Section 48-3a-906, if the name is distinguishable on the records of the division from the names that are not available under Section 48-3a-108.

(2)  To register its name or an alternate name adopted pursuant to Section 48-3a-906, a foreign limited liability company must deliver to the division for filing an application stating the foreign limited liability company's name, the jurisdiction and date of its formation, and any alternate name adopted pursuant to Section 48-3a-906.  If the division finds that the name applied for is available, the division shall register the name for the applicant's exclusive use.

(3)  The registration of a name under this section is effective for one year after the date of registration.

(4)  A foreign limited liability company whose name registration is effective may renew the registration for successive one-year periods by delivering, not earlier than three months before the expiration of the registration, to the division for filing a renewal application that complies with this section.  When filed, the renewal application renews the registration for a succeeding one-year period.

(5)  A foreign limited liability company whose name registration is effective may register as a foreign limited liability company under the registered name or consent in a signed record to the use of that name by another person that is not an individual.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

